Alabama, session 2026rs, SB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 34-8-7, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§34-8-7
(a) The following shall be exempted from this chapter:
(1) The practice of general contracting, as defined in
Section 34-8-1, by an authorized representative of the United
States Government, the State of Alabama, or an incorporated
town, city, or county in this state, which is under the
supervision of a licensed architect or engineer, provided any
work contracted out by the authorized representative shall
comply with the definition in this chapter for general
contractor.
(2) The construction or repair of any residence or
private dwelling or any residential swimming pool.
(3) A person, firm, or corporation constructing a
building or other improvements on his, her, or its own
property, provided that any of the work contracted out
complies with the definition in this chapter for general
contractor. A municipal governing body or municipal regulatory
body may not enact any ordinance or law restricting or
Page 1

body may not enact any ordinance or law restricting or
SB279 Enrolled
altering this exemption. Any municipal ordinance or regulation
that conflicts with this exemption is repealed effective June
11, 2015.
(4) The installation, repair, maintenance, or removal
of facilities, equipment, or systems used in or substantially
related to the generation, transmission, or distribution of
electric power, natural gas, or telecommunications in an
emergency by a utility regulated by the Public Service
Commission, or any entity engaged in the generation,
transmission, or distribution of electric power, natural gas,
or telecommunications, or any of their respective general
contractors or subcontractors, provided the work is performed
under the supervision of a licensed architect or engineer. For
purposes of this subdivision, the term "emergency" is defined
as a situation whereby service to the consumer has been
interrupted or may be interrupted if work to remedy the
emergency is not performed and completed within 60 days, and
such other situations that are determined to be an emergency
in the discretion of the board.
(5) The repair, maintenance, replacement,
reinstallation, or removal of facilities, equipment, or
systems used in or substantially related to the generation,
transmission, or distribution of electric power, natural gas,
or telecommunications on a routine, regular, or recurring
basis by a utility regulated by the Public Service Commission
or any entity engaged in the generation, transmission, or
distribution of electric power, natural gas, or
telecommunications or any of their respective general
Page 2

telecommunications or any of their respective general
SB279 Enrolled
contractors or subcontractors, provided the work is performed
under the supervision of a licensed architect or engineer.
(6) Routine or regular maintenance, repair,
replacement, reinstallation, or removal of equipment,
specialized technological processes, or equipment facility
systems as determined by the board with regard to scope,
frequency, and specialty of the work to be performed.
(7) Routine landscape maintenance work that includes
cutting grass; trimming, replacing, and removal of bushes,
shrubs, and similar items; the placement and removal of pine
straw, mulch, bark, and similar ground covers; and pressure
washing services and other routine ground maintenance.
(8) The provision of temporary labor by a labor broker
or other temporary labor provider that provides workers to a
general contractor to perform work under the supervision and
control of that general contractor. For the purposes of
licensing, temporary workers are deemed to fall under the
license of the general contractor to whom they are provided.
This exemption does not allow labor brokers or other temporary
labor providers to act as subcontractors or to assume a scope
of work for a project as a subcontractor.
(9) Routine or regular maintenance, repair, or removal
of the following, as determined by the board with regard to
scope, frequency, and specialty of the work to be performed:
a. Existing security and access control systems.
b. Existing lighting and filter systems.
c. Existing plumbing, air conditioning, and electrical
systems.
Page 3

systems.
SB279 Enrolled
d. Existing paint on painted surfaces.
(10) Routine cleaning, waste disposal, and janitorial
services, including the cleaning, stripping, and waxing of
floors.
(b) The exemptions provided in subsection (a) shall
exclude a swimming pool contractor. Provided, however, a
person, firm, or corporation constructing a swimming pool on
his, her, or its own property shall be exempted from this
chapter.
(c)(b) A subcontractor, as defined in Section
34-8-1(c), is subject to and shall comply with this chapter as
specified for a general contractor except as follows:
(1) A subcontractor shall pay one-half of the fees
required in this chapter for a general contractor.
(2) No bid limits shall be established for a
100 subcontractor.
101 (3) A subcontractor shall submit with license
102 application and renewals a statement of financial condition as
103 prescribed by the board.
104 (4) A subcontractor shall furnish three references from
105 any combination of the following: Licensed general
106 contractors, registered professional engineers, or registered
107 architects, or qualified person, as declared by the board, for
108 whom they have worked. If a subcontractor has only been
109 employed by one company, the subcontractor shall provide the
110 following: Three or more jobs he or she has worked on, the
111 amounts of the contracts, the time period of the contracts,
112 the location of the contracts, and a statement of experience.
Page 4

the location of the contracts, and a statement of experience.
SB279 Enrolled
113 (5) A subcontractor is not required to be licensed at
114 the time a project is bid, but must be licensed with the board
115 prior to beginning work on the project.
116 (6) A general contractor license and license number
117 issued by the board to subcontractors shall denote
118 subcontractor status.
119 (7) A subcontractor is not required to sit for any
120 examination before being licensed."
121 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
122 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
SB279 Enrolled
123
124
125
126
127
128
129 ________________________________________________
130 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
131
132
133
134 ________________________________________________
135 Speaker of the House of Representatives
136
137
138 SB279
139 Senate 25-Feb-26
140 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
141 the Senate, as amended.
142
143 Patrick Harris,
144 Secretary.
145
146
147
148
149 House of Representatives
150 Passed: 02-Apr-26
151
152
153
154
155 By: Senator Chambliss
Page 6